District of Columbia statutes.
2-117

Severability.

If any provision of this subchapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of said sections which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of said sections are declared to be severable.

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1919, ch. 802, § 16
1981 Ed., § 1-1017.
1973 Ed., § 1-717.